California, session 20252026, AB951.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1374.73 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:1374.73. (a) (1) Every health care service plan contract that provides hospital, medical, or surgical coverage shall also provide coverage for behavioral health treatment for pervasive developmental disorder or autism no later than July 1, 2012. The coverage shall be provided in the same manner and shall be subject to the same requirements as provided in Section 1374.72.(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), as of the date that the proposed final rulemaking for essential health benefits is issued, this section does not require any benefits to be provided that exceed the essential health benefits that all health plans will be required by federal regulations to provide under Section 1302(b) of the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152).(3) This section shall not affect services for which an individual is eligible pursuant to Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500) of the Welfare and Institutions Code or Title 14 (commencing with Section 95000) of the Government Code.(4) This section shall not affect or reduce any obligation to provide services under an individualized education program, as defined in Section 56032 of the Education Code, or an individual service plan, as described in Section 5600.4 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or under the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) and its implementing regulations.(b) Every health care service plan subject to this section shall maintain an adequate network that includes qualified autism service providers who supervise or employ qualified autism service professionals or paraprofessionals who provide and administer behavioral health treatment. A health care service plan is not prevented from selectively contracting with providers within these requirements.(c) (1) A health care service plan contract issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2026, shall not require an enrollee previously diagnosed with pervasive developmental disorder or autism to receive a rediagnosis to maintain coverage for behavioral health treatment for pervasive developmental disorder or autism.(2) This subdivision does not prohibit or restrict a treating provider from reevaluating an enrollee for purposes of determining the appropriate treatment. The treatment plan shall be made available to the health care service plan upon request.(3) This subdivision does not prohibit a treating provider from prescribing a rediagnosis at the discretion of the physician licensed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code or a psychologist licensed pursuant to Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 2900) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.(4) A health care service plan shall not discontinue or delay existing treatment while waiting for a rediagnosis to be completed.(5) This subdivision does not prohibit a health care service plan from requiring utilization review. For the purpose of this section, utilization review is distinct from a rediagnosis.(d) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:(1) “Behavioral health treatment” means professional services and treatment programs, including applied behavior analysis and evidence-based behavior intervention programs, that develop or restore, to the maximum extent practicable, the functioning of an individual with pervasive developmental disorder or autism and that meet all of the following criteria:(A) The treatment is prescribed by a physician and surgeon licensed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of, or is developed by a psychologist licensed pursuant to Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 2900) of, Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.(B) The treatment is provided under a treatment plan prescribed by a qualified autism service provider and is administered by one of the following:(i) A qualified autism service provider.(ii) A qualified autism service professional supervised by the qualified autism service provider.(iii) A qualified autism service paraprofessional supervised by a qualified autism service provider or qualified autism service professional.(C) The treatment plan has measurable goals over a specific timeline that is developed and approved by the qualified autism service provider for the specific patient being treated. The treatment plan shall be reviewed no less than once every six months by the qualified autism service provider and modified whenever appropriate, and shall be consistent with Section 4686.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code pursuant to which the qualified autism service provider does all of the following:(i) Describes the patient’s behavioral health impairments or developmental challenges that are to be treated.(ii) Designs an intervention plan that includes the service type, number of hours, and parent participation needed to achieve the plan’s goal and objectives, and the frequency at which the patient’s progress is evaluated and reported.(iii) Provides intervention plans that utilize evidence-based practices, with demonstrated clinical efficacy in treating pervasive developmental disorder or autism.(iv) Discontinues intensive behavioral intervention services when the treatment goals and objectives are achieved or no longer appropriate.(D) The treatment plan is not used for purposes of providing or for the reimbursement of respite, daycare, or educational services and is not used to reimburse a parent for participating in the treatment program. The treatment plan shall be made available to the health care service plan upon request.(2) “Pervasive developmental disorder or autism” shall have the same meaning and interpretation as used in Section 1374.72.(3) “Qualified autism service provider” means either of the following:(A) A person who is certified by a national entity, such as the Behavior Analyst Certification Board, with a certification that is accredited by the National Commission for Certifying Agencies, and who designs, supervises, or provides treatment for pervasive developmental disorder or autism, provided the services are within the experience and competence of the person who is nationally certified.(B) A person licensed as a physician and surgeon, physical therapist, occupational therapist, psychologist, marriage and family therapist, educational psychologist, clinical social worker, professional clinical counselor, speech-language pathologist, or audiologist pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code, who designs, supervises, or provides treatment for pervasive developmental disorder or autism, provided the services are within the experience and competence of the licensee.(4) “Qualified autism service professional” means an individual who meets all of the following criteria:(A) Provides behavioral health treatment, which may include clinical case management and case supervision under the direction and supervision of a qualified autism service provider.(B) Is supervised by a qualified autism service provider.(C) Provides treatment pursuant to a treatment plan developed and approved by the qualified autism service provider.(D) Is either of the following:(i) A behavioral service provider who meets the education and experience qualifications described in Section 54342 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations for an Associate Behavior Analyst, Behavior Analyst, Behavior Management Assistant, Behavior Management Consultant, or Behavior Management Program.(ii) A psychological associate, an associate marriage and family therapist, an associate clinical social worker, or an associate professional clinical counselor, as defined and regulated by the Board of Behavioral Sciences or the Board of Psychology.(E) (i) Has training and experience in providing services for pervasive developmental disorder or autism pursuant to Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500) of the Welfare and Institutions Code or Title 14 (commencing with Section 95000) of the Government Code.(ii) If an individual meets the requirement described in clause (ii) of subparagraph (D), the individual shall also meet the criteria set forth in the regulations adopted pursuant to Section 4686.4 of the Welfare and Institutions Code for a Behavioral Health Professional.(F) Is employed by the qualified autism service provider or an entity or group that employs qualified autism service providers responsible for the autism treatment plan.(5) “Qualified autism service paraprofessional” means an unlicensed and uncertified individual who meets all of the following criteria:(A) Is supervised by a qualified autism service provider or qualified autism service professional at a level of clinical supervision that meets professionally recognized standards of practice.(B) Provides treatment and implements services pursuant to a treatment plan developed and approved by the qualified autism service provider.(C) Meets the education and training qualifications described in Section 54342 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.(D) Has adequate education, training, and experience, as certified by a qualified autism service provider or an entity or group that employs qualified autism service providers.(E) Is employed by the qualified autism service provider or an entity or group that employs qualified autism service providers responsible for the autism treatment plan.(6) “Rediagnosis” means a subsequent undertaking by any method, device, or procedure, whether gratuitous or not, to ascertain or establish if a person is suffering from a physical or mental health disorder, pursuant to Section 2038 of the Business and Professions Code. “Rediagnosis” also means prescription of a subsequent diagnosis of pervasive developmental disorders or autism to ascertain or establish if a person is suffering from a pervasive developmental disorder or autism.(7) “Utilization review” means utilization review or utilization management functions that prospectively, retrospectively, or concurrently review and approve, modify, or deny, based in whole or in part on medical necessity to cure and relieve, treatment recommendations by physicians licensed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code before, after, or concurrent with the provision of medical treatment services. “Utilization review” refers to an evaluation of existing treatment to ensure an enrollee receives the proper care at the proper time.(e) This section shall not apply to either of the following:(1) A specialized health care service plan that does not deliver mental health or behavioral health services to enrollees.(2) A health care service plan contract in the Medi-Cal program (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code).(f) This section does not limit the obligation to provide services under Section 1374.72.(g) As provided in Section 1374.72 and in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), in the provision of benefits required by this section, a health care service plan may utilize case management, network providers, utilization review techniques, prior authorization, copayments, or other cost sharing.SEC. 2. Section 10144.51 of the Insurance Code is amended to read:10144.51. (a) (1) Every health insurance policy shall also provide coverage for behavioral health treatment for pervasive developmental disorder or autism no later than July 1, 2012. The coverage shall be provided in the same manner and shall be subject to the same requirements as provided in Section 10144.5.(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), as of the date that the proposed final rulemaking for essential health benefits is issued, this section does not require any benefits to be provided that exceed the essential health benefits that all health insurers will be required by federal regulations to provide under Section 1302(b) of the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152).(3) This section shall not affect services for which an individual is eligible pursuant to Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500) of the Welfare and Institutions Code or Title 14 (commencing with Section 95000) of the Government Code.(4) This section shall not affect or reduce any obligation to provide services under an individualized education program, as defined in Section 56032 of the Education Code, or an individual service plan, as described in Section 5600.4 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or under the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) and its implementing regulations.(b) Pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 2240) of Subchapter 2 of Chapter 5 of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations, every health insurer subject to this section shall maintain an adequate network that includes qualified autism service providers who supervise or employ qualified autism service professionals or paraprofessionals who provide and administer behavioral health treatment. A health insurer is not prevented from selectively contracting with providers within these requirements.(c) (1) A health insurance policy issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2026, shall not require an insured previously diagnosed with pervasive developmental disorder or autism to receive a rediagnosis to maintain coverage for behavioral health treatment for pervasive developmental disorder or autism.(2) This subdivision does not prohibit or restrict a treating provider from reevaluating an insured for purposes of determining the appropriate treatment. The treatment plan shall be made available to the insurer upon request.(3) This subdivision does not prohibit a treating provider from prescribing a rediagnosis at the discretion of the physician licensed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code or a psychologist licensed pursuant to Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 2900) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.(4) A health insurer shall not discontinue or delay existing treatment while waiting for a rediagnosis to be completed.(5) This subdivision does not prohibit a health insurer from requiring utilization review. For the purpose of this section, utilization review is distinct from a rediagnosis.(d) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:(1) “Behavioral health treatment” means professional services and treatment programs, including applied behavior analysis and evidence-based behavior intervention programs, that develop or restore, to the maximum extent practicable, the functioning of an individual with pervasive developmental disorder or autism, and that meet all of the following criteria:(A) The treatment is prescribed by a physician and surgeon licensed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of, or is developed by a psychologist licensed pursuant to Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 2900) of, Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.(B) The treatment is provided under a treatment plan prescribed by a qualified autism service provider and is administered by one of the following:(i) A qualified autism service provider.(ii) A qualified autism service professional supervised by the qualified autism service provider.(iii) A qualified autism service paraprofessional supervised by a qualified autism service provider or qualified autism service professional.(C) The treatment plan has measurable goals over a specific timeline that is developed and approved by the qualified autism service provider for the specific patient being treated. The treatment plan shall be reviewed no less than once every six months by the qualified autism service provider and modified whenever appropriate, and shall be consistent with Section 4686.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code pursuant to which the qualified autism service provider does all of the following:(i) Describes the patient’s behavioral health impairments or developmental challenges that are to be treated.(ii) Designs an intervention plan that includes the service type, number of hours, and parent participation needed to achieve the plan’s goal and objectives, and the frequency at which the patient’s progress is evaluated and reported.(iii) Provides intervention plans that utilize evidence-based practices, with demonstrated clinical efficacy in treating pervasive developmental disorder or autism.(iv) Discontinues intensive behavioral intervention services when the treatment goals and objectives are achieved or no longer appropriate.(D) The treatment plan is not used for purposes of providing or for the reimbursement of respite, daycare, or educational services and is not used to reimburse a parent for participating in the treatment program. The treatment plan shall be made available to the insurer upon request.(2) “Pervasive developmental disorder or autism” shall have the same meaning and interpretation as used in Section 10144.5.(3) “Qualified autism service provider” means either of the following:(A) A person who is certified by a national entity, such as the Behavior Analyst Certification Board, with a certification that is accredited by the National Commission for Certifying Agencies, and who designs, supervises, or provides treatment for pervasive developmental disorder or autism, provided the services are within the experience and competence of the person who is nationally certified.(B) A person licensed as a physician and surgeon, physical therapist, occupational therapist, psychologist, marriage and family therapist, educational psychologist, clinical social worker, professional clinical counselor, speech-language pathologist, or audiologist pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code, who designs, supervises, or provides treatment for pervasive developmental disorder or autism, provided the services are within the experience and competence of the licensee.(4) “Qualified autism service professional” means an individual who meets all of the following criteria:(A) Provides behavioral health treatment, which may include clinical case management and case supervision under the direction and supervision of a qualified autism service provider.(B) Is supervised by a qualified autism service provider.(C) Provides treatment pursuant to a treatment plan developed and approved by the qualified autism service provider.(D) Is either of the following:(i) A behavioral service provider who meets the education and experience qualifications described in Section 54342 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations for an Associate Behavior Analyst, Behavior Analyst, Behavior Management Assistant, Behavior Management Consultant, or Behavior Management Program.(ii) A psychological associate, an associate marriage and family therapist, an associate clinical social worker, or an associate professional clinical counselor, as defined and regulated by the Board of Behavioral Sciences or the Board of Psychology.(E) (i) Has training and experience in providing services for pervasive developmental disorder or autism pursuant to Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500) of the Welfare and Institutions Code or Title 14 (commencing with Section 95000) of the Government Code.(ii) If an individual meets the requirement described in clause (ii) of subparagraph (D), the individual shall also meet the criteria set forth in the regulations adopted pursuant to Section 4686.4 of the Welfare and Institutions Code for a Behavioral Health Professional.(F) Is employed by the qualified autism service provider or an entity or group that employs qualified autism service providers responsible for the autism treatment plan.(5) “Qualified autism service paraprofessional” means an unlicensed and uncertified individual who meets all of the following criteria:(A) Is supervised by a qualified autism service provider or qualified autism service professional at a level of clinical supervision that meets professionally recognized standards of practice.(B) Provides treatment and implements services pursuant to a treatment plan developed and approved by the qualified autism service provider.(C) Meets the education and training qualifications described in Section 54342 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.(D) Has adequate education, training, and experience, as certified by a qualified autism service provider or an entity or group that employs qualified autism service providers.(E) Is employed by the qualified autism service provider or an entity or group that employs qualified autism service providers responsible for the autism treatment plan.(6) “Rediagnosis” means a subsequent undertaking by any method, device, or procedure, whether gratuitous or not, to ascertain or establish if a person is suffering from a physical or mental health disorder, pursuant to Section 2038 of the Business and Professions Code. “Rediagnosis” also means prescription of a subsequent diagnosis of pervasive developmental disorders or autism to ascertain or establish if a person is suffering from a pervasive developmental disorder or autism.(7) “Utilization review” means utilization review or utilization management functions that prospectively, retrospectively, or concurrently review and approve, modify, or deny, based in whole or in part on medical necessity to cure and relieve, treatment recommendations by physicians licensed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code before, after, or concurrent with the provision of medical treatment services. “Utilization review” refers to an evaluation of existing treatment to ensure the insured receives the proper care at the proper time.(e) This section shall not apply to either of the following:(1) A specialized health insurance policy that does not cover mental health or behavioral health services or an accident-only, specified disease, hospital indemnity, or Medicare supplement policy.(2) A health insurance policy in the Medi-Cal program (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code).(f) This section does not limit the obligation to provide services under Section 10144.5.(g) As provided in Section 10144.5 and in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), in the provision of benefits required by this section, a health insurer may utilize case management, network providers, utilization review techniques, prior authorization, copayments, or other cost sharing.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.